Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.305

Open carry of weapons prohibited on state capitol grounds and municipal buildings.

(1) Unless exempt under subsection (3) of this section, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly open carry a firearm or other weapon, as defined in RCW 9.41.300(1)(b), while knowingly being in the following locations:

(a) The west state capitol campus grounds; any buildings on the state capitol grounds; any state legislative office; or any location of a public state legislative hearing or meeting during the hearing or meeting; or

(b) City, town, county, or other municipality buildings used in connection with meetings of the governing body of the city, town, county, or other municipality, or any location of a public meeting or hearing of the governing body of a city, town, county, or other municipality during the hearing or meeting.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Buildings on the state capitol grounds" means the following buildings located on the state capitol grounds, commonly known as Legislative, Temple of Justice, John L. O'Brien, John A. Cherberg, Irving R. Newhouse, Joel M. Pritchard, Helen Sommers, Insurance, Governor's Mansion, Visitor Information Center, Carlyon House, Ayer House, General Administration, 1500 Jefferson, James M. Dolliver, Old Capitol, Capitol Court, State Archives, Natural Resources, Office Building #2, Highway-License, Transportation, Employment Security, Child Care Center, Union Avenue, Washington Street, Professional Arts, State Farm, and Powerhouse Buildings.

(b) "Governing body" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.30.020.

(c) "West state capitol campus grounds" means areas of the campus south of Powerhouse Rd. SW, south of Union Avenue SW as extended westward to Powerhouse Rd. SW, west of Capitol Way, north of 15th Avenue SW between Capitol Way S. and Water Street SW, west of Water Street between 15th Avenue SW and 16th Avenue SW, north of 16th Avenue SW between Water Street SW and the east banks of Capitol Lake, and east of the banks of Capitol Lake.

(3) Duly authorized federal, state, or local law enforcement officers or personnel are exempt from this section when carrying a firearm or other weapon in conformance with their employing agency's policy. Members of the armed forces of the United States or the state of Washington are exempt from this section when carrying a firearm or other weapon in the discharge of official duty or traveling to or from official duty.

(4)(a) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Second and subsequent violations of this section are a gross misdemeanor.

(5) Nothing in this section applies to the lawful concealed carry of a firearm by a person who has a valid concealed pistol license.

(6) A city, town, county, or other municipality must post signs providing notice of the restrictions on possession of firearms and other weapons under this section at any locations specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

[ 2023 c 470 s 3006; 2022 c 106 s 2; 2021 c 261 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—2021 c 261: See note following RCW 9.41.300.